District of Columbia statutes.
4-204.12

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Medicaid Operations Reform.

(1A)

“Foster Care and Adoption Assistance” means the programs authorized by Part E of Title IV of the Social Security Act, approved June 17, 1980 (94 Stat. 501; 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq.).

(2)

“Medicaid” means the medical assistance programs authorized by title XIX of the Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 343; 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), or by § 1-307.02, and administered by the Department of Health.

(2A)

“Medicare” means the health insurance programs authorized by Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 290; 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.).

(3)

“Office” means the Office of Medicaid Operations Reform.

History

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1502, 49 DCR 6968
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 1502(b), 50 DCR 5668

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-39, in pars. (1) and (3), deleted “Public Provider” following “Medicaid”; added pars. (1A) and (2A); and in par. (2), substituted “or by” for “and by”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1502(b) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1502(b) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).